Washington statutes.
RCW 7.40.050

Notice—Restraining orders in emergencies.

No injunction shall be granted until it shall appear to the court or judge granting it, that some one or more of the opposite party concerned, has had reasonable notice of the time and place of making application, except that in cases of emergency to be shown in the complaint, the court may grant a restraining order until notice can be given and hearing had thereon.

[Code 1881 s 156; 1877 p 33 s 156; 1869 p 39 s 154; 1854 p 153 s 114; RRS s 722.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: CR 52(a)(2)(A), 65.